Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2018.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 9104(d) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 9104. Scope.* * *(d) Certain disclosures authorized.--(1) Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit a criminal justice agency from disclosing an individual's prior criminal activity to an individual or agency if the information disclosed is based on records set forth in subsection (a).(2) Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit a criminal 12345678910111213141516171819 justice agency from disclosing criminal history record information and intelligence information, investigative information, treatment information, including medical and psychological information, caution indicator information, modus operandi information, missing persons information, employment history information, personal history information or presentence investigative information to members of a Domestic Violence Fatality Review Board established under 23 Pa.C.S. Ch. 68 (relating to Domestic Violence Fatality Review Program) and authorized under that chapter to investigate and analyze domestic violence-related fatalities.* * *Section 2. Section 9121(b.1) of Title 18 is amended to read:§ 9121. General regulations.* * *(b.1) Exception.--Subsection (b)(1) and (2) shall not apply [if]:(1) If the request is made by a county children and youth agency or the Department of Human Services in the performance of duties relating to children and youth under the act of June 24, 1937 (P.L.2017, No.396), known as the County Institution District Law, [section 2168 of the act of August 9, 1955 (P.L.323, No.130), known as The County Code,] 16 Pa.C.S. § 15768 (relating to powers and duties of county commissioners relating to children), the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, 23 Pa.C.S. Ch. 63 (relating to child protective services) or 42 Pa.C.S. Ch. 63 (relating to juvenile matters).(2) If the request is made by a domestic violence fatality review team or the Domestic Violence Fatality Review 20250HB2018PN2577 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Board established under 23 Pa.C.S. Ch. 68 (relating to Domestic Violence Fatality Review Program) and authorized under that chapter to investigate and analyze domestic violence-related fatalities.* * *Section 3. Section 6340(a) of Title 23 is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 6340. Release of information in confidential reports.(a) General rule.--Reports specified in section 6339 (relating to confidentiality of reports) shall only be made available to:* * *(10.1) Members of a domestic violence fatality review team and members of the Domestic Violence Fatality Review Board established under Chapter 68 (relating to Domestic Violence Fatality Review Program) and authorized under that chapter to investigate and analyze domestic violence-related fatalities.* * *Section 4. Title 23 is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 68DOMESTIC VIOLENCE FATALITY REVIEW PROGRAMSec.6801. Scope of chapter.6802. Definitions.6803. Domestic Violence Fatality Review Program.6804. Domestic violence fatality review teams.6805. Domestic Violence Fatality Review Board.6806. Access to records.6807. Confidentiality.20250HB2018PN2577 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 6808. Penalties.§ 6801. Scope of chapter.This chapter relates to domestic violence fatality review.§ 6802. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Domestic Violence Fatality Review Board" or "board." A multidisciplinary, Statewide panel that advises domestic violence fatality review teams and recommends Statewide improvements in domestic violence investigation, intervention and prevention efforts."Domestic violence fatality review team" or "review team." A multidisciplinary team that reviews domestic violence-related fatalities in a local jurisdiction."Domestic violence-related fatality." A death resulting from or relating to an act of abuse as defined in section 6102 (relating to definitions), including the fatality of a victim, perpetrator, family member, partner or bystander.§ 6803. Domestic Violence Fatality Review Program.(a) Establishment.--The Office of Attorney General shall establish a program to be known as the Domestic Violence Fatality Review Program and a Domestic Violence Fatality Review Board, consisting of domestic violence fatality review teams with the purpose of investigating domestic violence-related fatalities and identifying gaps in systemic responses to domestic violence, as well as recommending improvements in domestic violence investigations, interventions and prevention efforts throughout this Commonwealth.(b) Administration.--The Office of Attorney General shall 20250HB2018PN2577 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 coordinate the activities of the board and shall be responsible for the provision of standard protocols, training and technical assistance to review teams.(c) Case selection.--A review team and the board may only review domestic violence-related fatalities in which:(1) no criminal charges have been filed against a perpetrator associated with a domestic violence-related fatality and the chief law enforcement officer of the jurisdiction indicates that no criminal charges will be filed; or(2) all criminal legal proceedings associated with a domestic violence-related fatality have been closed.§ 6804. Domestic violence fatality review teams.(a) Duties.--A domestic violence fatality review team shall:(1) Gather information regarding the events leading to and facts surrounding incidences of domestic violence-related fatalities.(2) Analyze information gathered regarding domestic violence-related fatalities.(3) Identify trends, patterns and risk factors resulting from domestic violence-related fatality investigations.(4) Examine and assess service delivery related to domestic violence.(5) Provide aggregated fatality review reports to the board pursuant to section 6805 (relating to Domestic Violence Fatality Review Board).(b) Protocols.--A review team shall establish a protocol for the investigation of domestic violence-related fatalities in consultation with the board.(c) Location.--A review team may be established in any 20250HB2018PN2577 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 jurisdiction or combination of jurisdictions.(d) Membership.--Membership of a review team may include court personnel, law enforcement, medical professionals, victim advocates and any other individual or entity that the review team deems appropriate for the conduct of the review.(e) Additional duties.--In furtherance of the purposes of this section, a review team may recommend any of the following:(1) Changes in legislation, regulations, policies, budgets, treatment and service standards that may facilitate the reduction of domestic violence-related fatalities.(2) Prevention and intervention strategies.(3) Public awareness strategies.(4) Strategies for enhanced interagency coordination.§ 6805. Domestic Violence Fatality Review Board.(a) Powers and duties.--The Domestic Violence Fatality Review Board shall:(1) Advise and consult with review teams.(2) Provide education and technical assistance to review teams.(3) Develop minimum data collection guidelines for review teams.(4) Receive summary fatality review reports from review teams.(5) Analyze data from the reports of review teams to identify Statewide trends and patterns associated with domestic violence-related fatalities.(6) Recommend changes to domestic violence prevention, intervention and investigation efforts and monitor the implementation of these recommendations.(7) Prepare an annual report of findings, 20250HB2018PN2577 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 recommendations and steps taken to implement recommendations subject to the following requirements:(i) The annual report may not contain information identifying any victim or alleged perpetrator of domestic violence or their family members.(ii) The annual report shall be submitted to the public and the Governor on September 1 of each year and shall be presented at a joint meeting of the Judiciary Committee of the Senate and the Judiciary Committee of the House of Representatives at a public hearing.(b) Membership.--At a minimum, the board shall be composed of a designee from:(1) The Office of Attorney General.(2) The Pennsylvania Coalition Against Domestic Violence.(3) Two local domestic violence programs as defined in section 2333(e) of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, to be chosen by a majority vote of the board from a list of at least six programs provided by the Pennsylvania Coalition Against Domestic Violence.(4) The Office of Physician General.(5) The Office of Victim Advocate.(6) The Pennsylvania Parole Board.(7) The Pennsylvania State Police.(8) The Administrative Office of Pennsylvania Courts.(9) Three community members impacted by domestic violence or a domestic violence-related fatality to be chosen by a majority vote of the board from a list of at least nine community members provided by the Pennsylvania Coalition 20250HB2018PN2577 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Against Domestic Violence.(10) The Pennsylvania Commission on Crime and Delinquency.(11) An eligible legal services provider as defined in 42 Pa.C.S. § 4903 (relating to definitions).(12) The State association of sheriffs authorized by the act of June 14, 1923 (P.L.774, No.305), entitled "An act authorizing the sheriffs of the several counties of this Commonwealth to organize themselves into a State Association, for the purpose of holding annual meetings, to secure more uniformity and cooperation in the conduct of their offices, and providing for the payment of certain expenses in connection with such meetings by the various counties."(13) A rape crisis center, as defined in section 2333(e) of The Administrative Code of 1929, to be selected by a majority vote of the board.(14) The State association for district attorneys as provided in 16 Pa.C.S. § 12340 (relating to State associations) to be selected by a majority vote of the board.(15) Two members of the Senate appointed by the President pro tempore, one from the majority party and one from the minority party.(16) Two members of the House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker, one from the majority party and one from the minority party.(17) Any other person that the board by a majority vote deems appropriate.(c) Initial board organization.--The initial organization of the board shall consist of the designees under subsection (b)(1), (2), (4), (5), (6), (7), (8), (10), (11), (12), (15) and 20250HB2018PN2577 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (16). After these members are organized into the board, the board shall act to name designees to the board under subsection (b)(2), (3), (9), (13), (14) and (17). Thereafter the board shall conduct its normal business.§ 6806. Access to records.(a) Power.--A review team and the board have the power to access and review the following records to the extent permitted by law or court rule:(1) Guardian ad litem reports, parenting evaluations and victim impact statements.(2) Media accounts.(3) Protection from abuse documents, transcripts, violations and other materials as produced by the courts and law enforcement officials.(4) Criminal history record information.(5) Law enforcement incident documentation from closed cases, such as incident reports, dispatch records, victim, witness and suspect reports.(6) Medical examiners' and coroners' reports.(7) Records of court proceedings.(8) Documents, reports and evaluations prepared in conjunction with court proceedings pursuant to general or local court rules.(9) Probation and parole information.(10) Reports to animal control.(11) Presentence interviews and reports, and any recommendations made regarding bail and release on own recognizance.(12) Investigative reports from the Office of Children, Youth and Families.20250HB2018PN2577 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (13) Statements from witnesses, friends, family and employers of the victim and perpetrator.(14) Any other information determined to be relevant to the review that will not jeopardize an ongoing investigation or prosecution.(b) Court order.--In the event that the custodian of a record described under subsection (a) refuses a request by a review team or the board for access to the record, the court shall issue an order directing the custodian of the records to comply with the request.(c) Confidentiality of information.--A review team and the board shall maintain the confidentiality of information contained in record assessment under this section to the extent required by any applicable law.(d) Immunity.--An entity, individual or institution that in good faith provides information or records to a review team or the board is immune from civil or criminal liability that might otherwise be imposed as a result of providing the information or record.§ 6807. Confidentiality.(a) Signed confidentiality agreement.--Each member of a review team and the board and any individual appearing before them shall be required to sign a confidentiality agreement created by the board in order to maintain the confidentiality of the proceedings.(b) Confidentiality of proceedings, deliberations and opinions.--(1) The proceedings, deliberations and opinions of a review team and the board and their members are privileged and confidential, except as otherwise provided by this 20250HB2018PN2577 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 chapter.(2) Information known to or opinions held by members of a review team or the board and any individual who presents information to a review team or the board is not subject to discovery, subpoena or introduction into evidence in any civil or criminal action, except as otherwise provided in this chapter.(c) Confidentiality of records.--(1) The records of a review team and the board are privileged and confidential, except as otherwise provided by this chapter. Records of a review team and the board are not subject to discovery, subpoena or introduction into evidence in any civil or criminal action, except as otherwise provided in this chapter.(2) All records brought to a review team by a person or agency remain the property of that person or agency and shall be maintained by the person or agency to which the records belong.(3) All records produced by a review team are the property of that review team. The records, including the names of victims, alleged perpetrators and family members, as well as documents relating to the proceedings, opinions and deliberations of a review team, shall remain confidential and are not subject to inspection and duplication under the Right-to-Know Law.(4) All records produced by the board are the property of the board. The records, including the names of victims, alleged perpetrators and family members, as well as documents relating to the proceedings, opinions and deliberations of the board shall remain confidential and are not subject to 20250HB2018PN2577 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 inspection and duplication under the Right-to-Know Law.(5) Release of aggregated statistics, scenarios, annual reports, recommendations and other nonidentifying information by a review team or the board does not conflict with the duty of confidentiality under this section.(d) Discovery.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to restrict or limit the right to discover or use in a civil or criminal action any evidence that is discoverable independent of the proceedings of a review team or the board.(e) Immunity of members.--(1) The board and its members and any review team and its members acting within the scope of the program are immune from all civil liability resulting from an act or omission arising out of and in the course of the board's or the review team's performance of that activity, unless the act or omission was the result of gross negligence, recklessness or intentional misconduct.(2) This subsection shall not be construed to limit any other immunity provided by statute or common law.§ 6808. Penalties.A person who discloses, makes use of or knowingly permits the use of information concerning a victim or other persons in violation of this chapter commits a summary offense.Section 5. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026, or immediately, whichever is later.20250HB2018PN2577 - 12 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425